Utah statutes.
76-9-301.5.   Spectator at organized animal fighting exhibitions.

It is unlawful for a person to knowingly be present as a spectator at any place, building, or tenement where preparations are being made for an exhibition of the fighting of animals, as prohibited by Subsections 76-9-301(2)(d) and (e), or to be present at such exhibition, regardless of whether any entrance fee has been charged.  A person who violates this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 292, 2008 General Session

